Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB517.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 150.172 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any person who is not prohibited by state or federal law from possessing a firearm
may carry a firearm and ammunition for that firearm for purposes of self-defense
and defense of others while hunting, fishing, trapping, or engaging in any other
activity not constituting a crime under KRS Chapter 218A or Chapters 500 to 534,
and may do so on any public lands under the control of the department and on any
private land under the control of the department, unless the owner of the private
land has posted notice that concealed deadly weapons are not allowed in a building
where they may be prohibited pursuant to KRS 237.110[ or 237.115].
(2) (a) A person may use a firearm, if he or she is not prohibited by state or federal
law from possessing a firearm, or may use any other deadly weapon, at any
time and during any season to:
1. Kill or attempt to kill an animal, whether protected or unprotected, in
self-defense or defense of another person; or
2. Kill or attempt to kill an injured animal for humane purposes; and
in either event, reports the kill or attempted kill to a game warden before
midnight of the same day as the kill or attempted kill.
(b) An investigation by the department shall be authorized to substantiate and
provide evidence on whether the kill or attempted kill of the animal is in
violation of paragraph (a) of this subsection or if the animal presents a threat
to public health and safety. If no violation is shown to exist, and if there is no
threat to public health and safety, then the animal or parts thereof shall:
1. Remain the property and in the possession of the person taking the
animal; or
2. If the animal or parts thereof were surrendered to the department, be
Page 1 of 34
XXXX 1/13/2026 2:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1766
immediately returned to the person.
(c) An arrest shall not be made, except upon a warrant issued by a judge of a
court of competent jurisdiction, and a citation shall not be issued by a peace
officer if an animal is killed under circumstances described in paragraph (a) of
this subsection.
(d) A citation may be issued by a peace officer who witnesses the killing of an
animal in violation of a statute or federal regulation under circumstances
different from those described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(e) An arrest warrant or a summons may be issued by a judge of a court of
competent jurisdiction, upon application of the appropriate county attorney, if
the court believes that there is sufficient cause to doubt the claim that the
animal was killed under circumstances described in paragraph (a) of this
subsection.
(3) In cases where an animal is killed and there is a claim that the animal was killed
under circumstances described in paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of this section, the
department shall provide competent evidence as to how the animal was killed and
the circumstances surrounding the event.
(4) The department shall not promulgate administrative regulations restricting any right
provided by this section or the spirit thereof.
(5) This section shall not apply to the killing, wounding, or other prohibited act relating
to specific wildlife which are protected by the federal Endangered Species Act, 16
U.S.C. secs. 1531 to 1544; federal Migratory Bird Treaty Act, 16 U.S.C. secs. 703
to 712; or federal Bald and Golden Eagle Protection Act, 16 U.S.C. secs. 668 to
668d.
(6) The principles contained in KRS Chapter 503 relating to the use of force and deadly
force against human beings shall apply to acts where wildlife is involved.
Section 2. KRS 237.110 is amended to read as follows:
Page 2 of 34
XXXX 1/13/2026 2:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1766
(1) The Department of Kentucky State Police is authorized to issue and renew licenses
to carry concealed firearms or other deadly weapons, or a combination thereof, to
persons qualified as provided in this section.
(2) An original or renewal license issued pursuant to this section shall:
(a) Be valid throughout the Commonwealth and, except as provided in this
section or other specific section of the Kentucky Revised Statutes or federal
law, permit the holder of the license to carry firearms, ammunition, or other
deadly weapons, or a combination thereof, at any location in the
Commonwealth;
(b) Unless revoked or suspended as provided by law, be valid for a period of five
(5) years from the date of issuance;
(c) Authorize the holder of the license to carry a concealed firearm or other
deadly weapon, or a combination thereof, on or about his or her person; and
(d) Authorize the holder of the license to carry ammunition for a firearm on or
about his or her person.
(3) Prior to the issuance of an original or renewal license to carry a concealed deadly
weapon, the Department of Kentucky State Police, upon receipt of a completed
application, applicable fees, and any documentation required by this section or
administrative regulation promulgated by the Department of Kentucky State Police,
shall conduct a background check to ascertain whether the applicant is eligible
under 18 U.S.C. sec. 922(g) and (n), any other applicable federal law, and state law
to purchase, receive, or possess a firearm or ammunition, or both. The background
check shall include:
(a) A state records check covering the items specified in this subsection, together
with any other requirements of this section;
(b) A federal records check, which shall include a National Instant Criminal
Background Check System (NICS) check;
Page 3 of 34
XXXX 1/13/2026 2:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1766
(c) A federal Immigration Alien Query if the person is an alien who has been
lawfully admitted to the United States by the United States government or an
agency thereof; and
(d) In addition to the Immigration Alien Query, if the applicant has not been
lawfully admitted to the United States under permanent resident status, the
Department of Kentucky State Police shall, if a doubt exists relating to an
alien's eligibility to purchase a firearm, consult with the United States
Department of Homeland Security, United States Department of Justice,
United States Department of State, or other federal agency to confirm whether
the alien is eligible to purchase a firearm in the United States, bring a firearm
into the United States, or possess a firearm in the United States under federal
law.
(4) The Department of Kentucky State Police shall issue an original or renewal license
if the applicant:
(a) Is not prohibited from the purchase, receipt, or possession of firearms,
ammunition, or both pursuant to 18 U.S.C. sec. 922(g) and (n)[, 18 U.S.C.
922(n)], or applicable federal or state law;
(b) 1. Is a citizen of the United States who is a resident of this
Commonwealth;
2. Is a citizen of the United States who is a member of the Armed Forces
of the United States who is on active duty, who is at the time of
application assigned to a military posting in Kentucky;
3. Is lawfully admitted to the United States by the United States
government or an agency thereof, is permitted by federal law to
purchase a firearm, and is a resident of this Commonwealth; or
4. Is lawfully admitted to the United States by the United States
government or an agency thereof;[,] is permitted by federal law to
Page 4 of 34
XXXX 1/13/2026 2:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1766
purchase a firearm;[,] is, at the time of the application, assigned to a
military posting in Kentucky;[,] and has been assigned to a posting in
the Commonwealth;
(c) Is twenty-one (21) years of age or older;
(d) Has not been committed to a state or federal facility for the abuse of a
controlled substance or been convicted of a misdemeanor violation of KRS
Chapter 218A or similar laws of any other state relating to controlled
substances, within a three (3) year period immediately preceding the date on
which the application is submitted;
(e) Does not chronically and habitually use alcoholic beverages as evidenced by
the applicant having two (2) or more convictions for violating KRS 189A.010
within the three (3) years immediately preceding the date on which the
application is submitted, or having been committed as an alcoholic pursuant to
KRS Chapter 222 or similar laws of another state within the three (3) year
period immediately preceding the date on which the application is submitted;
(f) Does not owe a child support arrearage which equals or exceeds the
cumulative amount which would be owed after one (1) year of nonpayment, if
the Department of Kentucky State Police has been notified of the arrearage by
the Office of the Attorney General;
(g) Has complied with any subpoena or warrant relating to child support or
paternity proceedings. If the Department of Kentucky State Police has not
been notified by the Office of the Attorney General that the applicant has
failed to meet this requirement, the Department of Kentucky State Police shall
assume that paternity and child support proceedings are not an issue;
(h) Has not been convicted of a violation of KRS 508.030 or 508.080 within the
three (3) years immediately preceding the date on which the application is
submitted. The commissioner of the Department of Kentucky State Police
Page 5 of 34
XXXX 1/13/2026 2:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1766
may waive this requirement upon good cause shown and a determination that
the applicant is not a danger and that a waiver would not violate federal law;
(i) Demonstrates competence with a firearm by successful completion of a
firearms safety or training course that is conducted by a firearms instructor
who is certified by a national organization with membership open to residents
of any state or territory of the United States, which was created to promote
firearms education, safety, and the profession of firearms use and training, and
to foster professional behavior in its members. The organization shall require
members to adhere to its own code of ethics and conduct a program which
certifies firearms instructors and includes the use of written tests, in person
instruction, and a component of live-fire training. These national
organizations shall include but are not limited to the National Rifle
Association, the United States Concealed Carry Association, and the National
Shooting Sports Foundation. The training requirement may also be fulfilled
through any firearms safety course offered or approved by the Department of
Criminal Justice Training. The firearms safety course offered or approved by
the Department of Criminal Justice Training shall:
1. Be not more than eight (8) hours in length;
2. Include instruction on handguns, the safe use of handguns, the care and
cleaning of handguns, and handgun marksmanship principles;
3. Include actual range firing of a handgun in a safe manner, and the firing
of not more than twenty (20) rounds at a full-size silhouette target,
during which firing, not less than eleven (11) rounds must hit the
silhouette portion of the target; and
4. Include information on and a copy of laws relating to possession and
carrying of firearms, as set forth in KRS Chapters 237 and 527, and the
laws relating to the use of force, as set forth in KRS Chapter 503; and
Page 6 of 34
XXXX 1/13/2026 2:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1766
(j) Demonstrates knowledge of the law regarding the justifiable use of force by
including with the application a copy of the concealed carry deadly weapons
legal handout made available by the Department of Criminal Justice Training
and a signed statement that indicates the[that] applicant has read and
understands the handout.
(5) (a) A legible photocopy or electronic copy of a certificate of completion issued
by a firearms instructor certified by a national organization or the Department
of Criminal Justice Training shall constitute evidence of qualification under
subsection (4)(i) of this section.
(b) Persons qualifying under subsection (6)(d) of this section may submit with
their application:
1. At least one (1) of the following paper or electronic forms or their
successor forms showing evidence of handgun training or handgun
qualifications:
a. Department of Defense Form DD 2586;
b. Department of Defense Form DD 214;
c. Coast Guard Form CG 3029;
d. Department of the Army Form DA 88-R;
e. Department of the Army Form DA 5704-R;
f. Department of the Navy Form OPNAV 3591-1; or
g. Department of the Air Force Form AF 522; or
2. a. Documentary evidence of an honorable discharge; and
b. A notarized affidavit on a form provided by the Department of
Kentucky State Police, signed under penalty of perjury, stating the
person has met the training requirements of subsection (6)(d) of
this section.
(6) (a) Peace officers who are currently certified as peace officers by the Kentucky
Page 7 of 34
XXXX 1/13/2026 2:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1766
Law Enforcement Council pursuant to KRS 15.380 to 15.404 and peace
officers who are retired and are members of the Kentucky Employees
Retirement System, State Police Retirement System,[ or] County Employees
Retirement System, or other retirement system operated by or for a city,
county, or urban-county government in Kentucky shall be deemed to have
met the training requirement.
(b) Current and retired peace officers of the following federal agencies shall be
deemed to have met the training requirement:
1. Any peace officer employed by a federal agency specified in KRS
61.365;
2. Any peace officer employed by a federal civilian law enforcement
agency not specified above who has successfully completed the basic
law enforcement training course required by that agency;
3. Any military peace officer of the United States Army, Navy, Marine
Corps, or Air Force, or a reserve component thereof, or of the Army
National Guard or Air National Guard who has successfully completed
the military law enforcement training course required by that branch of
the military;
4. Any member of the United States Coast Guard serving in a peace officer
role who has successfully completed the law enforcement training
course specified by the United States Coast Guard.
(c) Corrections officers who are currently employed by a consolidated local
government, an urban-county government, or the Department of Corrections
who have successfully completed a basic firearms training course required for
their employment, and corrections officers who were formerly employed by a
consolidated local government, an urban-county government, or the
Department of Corrections who are retired, and who successfully completed a
Page 8 of 34
XXXX 1/13/2026 2:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1766
basic firearms training course required for their employment, and are
members of a state-administered retirement system or other retirement system
operated by or for a city, county, or urban-county government in Kentucky
shall be deemed to have met the training requirement.
(d) Active or honorably discharged service members in the United States Army,
Navy, Marine Corps, Air Force, or Coast Guard, or a reserve component
thereof, or of the Army National Guard or Air National Guard shall be
deemed to have met the training requirement if these persons:
1. Successfully completed handgun training which was conducted by the
United States Army, Navy, Marine Corps, Air Force, or Coast Guard, or
a reserve component thereof, or of the Army National Guard or Air
National Guard; or
2. Successfully completed handgun qualification within the United States
Army, Navy, Marine Corps, Air Force, or Coast Guard, or a reserve
component thereof, or of the Army Guard or Air Force National Guard.
(7) (a) 1. A paper application for a license, or renewal of a license, to carry a
concealed deadly weapon shall be obtained from and submitted to the
office of the sheriff in the county in which the person resides.
2. An applicant, in lieu of a paper application, may submit an electronic
application for a license, or renewal of a license, to carry a concealed
deadly weapon to the Department of Kentucky State Police.
3. Persons qualifying under subsection (6)(d) of this section shall be
supplied the information in subsection (4)(i)4. of this section upon
obtaining an application.
(b) 1. The completed paper application and any documentation required by
this section plus an application fee or renewal fee, as appropriate, of
sixty dollars ($60) shall be presented to the office of the sheriff of the
Page 9 of 34
XXXX 1/13/2026 2:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1766
county in which the applicant resides.
2. The sheriff shall transmit the paper application and accompanying
material to the Department of Kentucky State Police within five (5)
working days.
3. Twenty dollars ($20) of the paper application fee shall be retained by the
office of the sheriff for official expenses of the office. Twenty dollars
($20) shall be sent to the Department of Kentucky State Police with the
application. Ten dollars ($10) shall be transmitted by the sheriff to the
Administrative Office of the Courts to fund background checks for
youth leaders, and ten dollars ($10) shall be transmitted to the
Administrative Office of the Courts to fund background checks for
applicants for concealed weapon carry permits[weapons].
(c) 1. A completed electronic application submitted in lieu of a paper
application, any documentation required by this section, and an
application fee or renewal fee, as appropriate, of seventy dollars ($70)
shall be presented to the Department of Kentucky State Police.
2. If an electronic application is submitted in lieu of a paper application,
thirty dollars ($30) of the electronic application fee shall be retained by
the Department of Kentucky State Police. Twenty dollars ($20) shall be
sent to the office of the sheriff of the applicant's county of residence for
official expenses of the office. Ten dollars ($10) shall be transmitted to
the Administrative Office of the Courts to fund background checks for
youth leaders, and ten dollars ($10) shall be transmitted to the
Administrative Office of the Courts to fund background checks for
applicants for concealed weapon carry permits.
(d) A full-time or part-time peace officer who is currently certified as a peace
officer by the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council and who is authorized by
Page 10 of 34
XXXX 1/13/2026 2:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1766
his or her employer or government authority to carry a concealed deadly
weapon at all times and all locations within the Commonwealth pursuant to
KRS 527.020, or a retired peace officer who is a member of the Kentucky
Employees Retirement System, State Police Retirement System, County
Employees Retirement System, or other retirement system operated by or for
a city, county, or urban-county government in Kentucky, shall be exempt
from paying the paper or electronic application or renewal fees.
(e) The application, whether paper or electronic, shall be completed, under oath,
on a form or in a manner established[promulgated] by the Department of
Kentucky State Police by administrative regulation promulgated in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A which shall include:
1. a. The name, address, place and date of birth, citizenship, gender,
and Social Security number of the applicant; and
b. If not a citizen of the United States, alien registration number if
applicable, passport number, visa number, mother's maiden name,
and other information necessary to determine the immigration
status and eligibility to purchase a firearm under federal law of a
person who is not a citizen of the United States;
2. A statement that, to the best of his or her knowledge, the applicant is in
compliance with criteria contained within subsections (3) and (4) of this
section;
3. A statement that the applicant, if qualifying under subsection (6)(d) of
this section, has provided:
a. At least one (1) of the forms listed in subsection (5) of this section;
or
b. i. Documentary evidence of an honorable discharge; and
ii. A notarized affidavit on a form provided by the Department
Page 11 of 34
XXXX 1/13/2026 2:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1766
of Kentucky State Police stating the person has met the
training requirements of subsection (6)(d) of this section;
4. A statement that the applicant has been furnished a copy of this section
and is knowledgeable about its provisions;
5. A statement that the applicant has been furnished a copy of, has read,
and understands KRS Chapter 503 as it pertains to the use of deadly
force for self-defense in Kentucky; and
6. A conspicuous warning that the application is executed under oath and
that a materially false answer to any question, or the submission of any
materially false document by the applicant, subjects the applicant to
criminal prosecution under KRS 523.030.
(8) The applicant shall submit to the sheriff of the applicant's county of residence or
county of military posting if submitting a paper application, or to the Department of
Kentucky State Police if submitting an electronic application:
(a) A completed application as described in subsection (7) of this section;
(b) A recent color photograph of the applicant, as prescribed by administrative
regulation;
(c) A paper or electronic certificate,[ or] an affidavit, or a document as described
in subsection (5) of this section;
(d) A paper or electronic document establishing the training exemption as
described in subsection (6) of this section; and
(e) For an applicant who is not a citizen of the United States and has been
lawfully admitted to the United States by the United States government or an
agency thereof, an affidavit as prescribed by administrative regulation
concerning his or her immigration status and his or her United States
government-issued[government issued]:
1. Permanent Resident Card I-551 or its equivalent successor
Page 12 of 34
XXXX 1/13/2026 2:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1766
identification;
2. Other United States government-issued[government issued] evidence of
lawful admission to the United States which includes the category of
admission, if admission has not been granted as a permanent resident;
and
3. Evidence of compliance with the provisions of 18 U.S.C. sec. 922(g)(5),
18 U.S.C. sec. 922(d)(5), or 18 U.S.C. sec. 922(y)(2), and 27 C.F.R. pt.
178, including, as appropriate, but not limited to evidence of ninety (90)
day residence in the Commonwealth, a valid current Kentucky hunting
license if claiming exemption as a hunter, or other evidence of eligibility
to purchase a firearm by an alien which is required by federal law or
regulation.
If an applicant presents identification specified in this paragraph, the sheriff
shall examine the identification, may record information from the
identification presented, and shall return the identification to the applicant.
(9) The Department of Kentucky State Police shall, within sixty (60) days after the date
of receipt of the items listed in subsection (8) of this section if the applicant
submitted a paper application, or within fifteen (15) business days after the date of
receipt of the items listed in subsection (8) of this section if the applicant applied
electronically, either:
(a) Issue the license; or
(b) Deny the application based solely on the grounds that the applicant fails to
qualify under the criteria listed in subsection (3) or (4) of this section. If the
Department of Kentucky State Police denies the application, it shall notify the
applicant in writing, stating the grounds for denial and informing the applicant
of a right to submit, within thirty (30) days, any additional documentation
relating to the grounds of denial. Upon receiving any additional
Page 13 of 34
XXXX 1/13/2026 2:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1766
documentation, the Department of Kentucky State Police shall reconsider its
decision and inform the applicant within twenty (20) days of the result of the
reconsideration. The applicant shall further be informed of the right to seek de
novo review of the denial in the District Court of his or her place of residence
within ninety (90) days from the date of the letter advising the applicant of the
denial.
(10) The Department of Kentucky State Police shall maintain an automated listing of
license holders and pertinent information, and this information shall be available
upon request[,] at all times to all Kentucky, federal, and other states' law
enforcement agencies. A request for the entire list of licensees, or for all licensees
in a geographic area, shall be denied. Only requests relating to a named licensee
shall be honored or available to law enforcement agencies. Information on
applications for licenses, names and addresses, or other identifying information
relating to license holders shall be confidential and shall not be made available
except to law enforcement agencies. No request for lists of local or statewide permit
holders shall be made to any state or local law enforcement agency, peace officer,
or other agency of government other than the Department of Kentucky State Police,
and no state or local law enforcement agency, peace officer, or agency of
government, other than the Department of Kentucky State Police, shall provide any
information to any requester not entitled to it by law.
(11) Within thirty (30) days after the changing of a permanent address, or within thirty
(30) days after the loss, theft, or destruction of a license, the licensee shall notify the
Department of Kentucky State Police of the loss, theft, or destruction. Failure to
notify the Department of Kentucky State Police shall constitute a noncriminal
violation with a penalty of twenty-five dollars ($25) payable to the clerk of the
District Court. No court costs shall be assessed for a violation of this subsection.
When a licensee makes application to change his or her residence address or other
Page 14 of 34
XXXX 1/13/2026 2:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1766
information on the license, neither the sheriff nor the Department of Kentucky State
Police shall require a surrender of the license until a new license is in the office of
the applicable sheriff and available for issuance. Upon the issuance of a new
license, the old license shall be destroyed by the sheriff.
(12) If a license is lost, stolen, or destroyed, the license shall be automatically invalid,
and the person to whom the same was issued may, upon payment of fifteen dollars
($15) for a paper request, or twenty-five dollars ($25) for an electronic request
submitted in lieu of a paper request, to the Department of Kentucky State Police,
obtain a duplicate, upon furnishing a notarized statement to the Department of
Kentucky State Police that the license has been lost, stolen, or destroyed.
(13) (a) The commissioner of the Department of Kentucky State Police, or his or her
designee in writing, shall revoke the license of any person who becomes
permanently ineligible to be issued a license or have a license renewed under
the criteria set forth in this section.
(b) The commissioner of the Department of Kentucky State Police, or his or her
designee in writing, shall suspend the license of any person who becomes
temporarily ineligible to be issued a license or have a license renewed under
the criteria set forth in this section. The license shall remain suspended until
the person is again eligible for the issuance or renewal of a license.
(c) Upon the suspension or revocation of a license, the commissioner of the
Department of Kentucky State Police, or his or her designee in writing, shall:
1. Order any peace officer to seize the license from the person whose
license was suspended or revoked; or
2. Direct the person whose license was suspended or revoked to surrender
the license to the sheriff of the person's county of residence within two
(2) business days of the receipt of the notice.
(d) If the person whose license was suspended or revoked desires a hearing on the
Page 15 of 34
XXXX 1/13/2026 2:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1766
matter, the person shall surrender the license as provided in paragraph (c)2. of
this subsection and petition the commissioner of the Department of Kentucky
State Police to hold a hearing on the issue of suspension or revocation of the
license.
(e) Upon receipt of the petition, the commissioner of the Department of Kentucky
State Police shall cause a hearing to be held in accordance with KRS Chapter
13B on the suspension or revocation of the license. If the license has not been
surrendered, no hearing shall be scheduled or held.
(f) If the hearing officer determines that the licensee's license was wrongly
suspended or revoked, the hearing officer shall order the commissioner of the
Department of Kentucky State Police to return the license and abrogate the
suspension or revocation of the license.
(g) Any party may appeal a decision pursuant to this subsection to the District
Court in the licensee's county of residence in the same manner as for the
denial of a license.
(h) If the license is not surrendered as ordered, the commissioner of the
Department of Kentucky State Police shall order a peace officer to seize the
license and deliver it to the commissioner.
(i) Failure to surrender a suspended or revoked license as ordered is a Class A
misdemeanor.
(j) The provisions of this subsection relating to surrender of a license shall not
apply if a court of competent jurisdiction has enjoined its surrender.
(k) When a domestic violence order or emergency protective order is issued
pursuant to the provisions of KRS Chapter 403 against a person holding a
license issued under this section, the holder of the permit shall surrender the
license to the court or to the officer serving the order. The officer to whom the
license is surrendered shall immediately[forthwith] transmit the license to the
Page 16 of 34
XXXX 1/13/2026 2:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1766
court issuing the order. The license shall be suspended until the order is
terminated, or until the judge who issued the order terminates the suspension
prior to the termination of the underlying domestic violence order or
emergency protective order, in writing and by return of the license, upon
proper motion by the license holder. Subject to the same conditions as above,
a peace officer against whom an emergency protective order or domestic
violence order has been issued shall not be permitted to carry a concealed
deadly weapon when not on duty, the provisions of KRS 527.020 to the
contrary notwithstanding.
(14) (a) Not less than one hundred twenty (120) days prior to the expiration date of the
license, the Department of Kentucky State Police shall mail to each licensee a
written notice of the expiration and a renewal form prescribed by the
Department of Kentucky State Police. The outside of the envelope containing
the license renewal notice shall bear only the name and address of the
applicant. No other information relating to the applicant shall appear on the
outside of the envelope sent to the applicant. The licensee may renew his or
her license on or before the expiration date by filing with the sheriff of his or
her county of residence the paper renewal form, or by filing with the
Department of Kentucky State Police an electronic renewal form in lieu of a
paper renewal form, stating that the licensee remains qualified pursuant to the
criteria specified in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, and the required
renewal fee set forth in subsection (7) of this section. The sheriff shall issue to
the applicant a receipt for the paper application for renewal of the license and
shall date the receipt. The Department of Kentucky State Police shall issue to
the applicant a receipt for an electronic application for renewal of the license
submitted in lieu of a paper application for renewal and shall date the receipt.
(b) A license which has expired shall be void and shall not be valid for any
Page 17 of 34
XXXX 1/13/2026 2:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1766
purpose other than surrender to the sheriff in exchange for a renewal license.
(c) The license shall be renewed to a qualified applicant upon receipt of the
completed renewal application, records check as specified in subsection (3) of
this section, determination that the renewal applicant is not ineligible for a
license as specified in subsection (4) of this section, and appropriate payment
of fees. Upon the issuance of a new license, the old license shall be destroyed
by the sheriff. A licensee who fails to file a renewal application on or before
its expiration date may renew his or her license by paying, in addition to the
license fees, a late fee of fifteen dollars ($15). No license shall be renewed six
(6) months or more after its expiration date, and the license shall be deemed to
be permanently expired six (6) months after its expiration date. A person
whose license has permanently expired may reapply for licensure pursuant to
subsections (7), (8), and (9) of this section.
(15) The licensee shall carry the license at all times the licensee is carrying a concealed
firearm or other deadly weapon and shall display the license upon request of a law
enforcement officer. Violation of the provisions of this subsection shall constitute a
noncriminal violation with a penalty of twenty-five dollars ($25), payable to the
clerk of the District Court, but no court costs shall be assessed.
(16) Except as provided in KRS 527.020, no license issued pursuant to this section shall
authorize any person to carry a concealed firearm into:
(a) Any police station or sheriff's office;
(b) Any detention facility, prison, or jail;
(c) Any courthouse[,] solely occupied by the Court of Justice, courtroom, or court
proceeding;
(d) Any meeting of the governing body of a county, municipality, or special
district; or any meeting of the General Assembly or a committee of the
General Assembly, except that nothing in this section shall preclude a member
Page 18 of 34
XXXX 1/13/2026 2:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1766
of the body[,] holding a concealed deadly weapon license[,] from carrying a
concealed deadly weapon at a meeting of the body of which he or she is a
member;
(e) Any portion of an establishment licensed to dispense beer or alcoholic
beverages for consumption on the premises, which portion of the
establishment is primarily devoted to that purpose;
(f) Any[ elementary or secondary school facility without the consent of school
authorities as provided in KRS 527.070, any] child-caring facility as defined
in KRS 199.011, any child-care[day-care] center as defined in KRS 199.894,
or any certified family child-care home as defined in KRS 199.8982, except
however, any owner of a certified child-care home may carry a concealed
firearm into the owner's residence used as a certified child-care home;
(g) An area of an airport to which access is controlled by the inspection of
persons and property by the Transportation Security Administration; or
(h) Any place where the carrying of firearms is prohibited by federal law.
(17) The owner, business or commercial lessee, or manager of a private business
enterprise, child-care[day-care] center as defined in KRS 199.894 or certified or
licensed family child-care home as defined in KRS 199.8982, or a health-care
facility licensed under KRS Chapter 216B, except facilities renting or leasing
housing, may prohibit persons holding concealed deadly weapon licenses from
carrying concealed deadly weapons on the premises and may prohibit employees,
not authorized by the employer, holding concealed deadly weapons licenses from
carrying concealed deadly weapons on the property of the employer. If the building
or the premises are open to the public, the employer or business enterprise shall
post signs on or about the premises if carrying concealed weapons is prohibited.
Possession of weapons,[ or] ammunition, or both in a vehicle on the premises shall
not be a criminal offense so long as the weapons,[ or] ammunition, or both are not
Page 19 of 34
XXXX 1/13/2026 2:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1766
removed from the vehicle or brandished while the vehicle is on the premises. A
private but not a public employer may prohibit employees or other persons holding
a concealed deadly weapons license from carrying concealed deadly weapons,[ or]
ammunition, or both in vehicles owned by the employer, but may not prohibit
employees or other persons holding a concealed deadly weapons license from
carrying concealed deadly weapons,[ or] ammunition, or both in vehicles owned by
the employee, except that the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet may prohibit an
employee from carrying any weapons,[ or] ammunition, or both other than the
weapons,[ or] ammunition, or both issued or authorized to be used by the employee
of the cabinet, in a vehicle while transporting persons under the employee's
supervision or jurisdiction. Carrying of a concealed weapon,[ or] ammunition, or
both in a location specified in this subsection by a license holder shall not be a
criminal act but may subject the person to denial from the premises or removal from
the premises, and, if an employee of an employer, disciplinary measures by the
employer.
(18) All moneys collected by the Department of Kentucky State Police pursuant to this
section shall be used to administer the provisions of this section and KRS 237.138
to 237.142. By March 1 of each year, the Department of Kentucky State Police and
the Administrative Office of the Courts shall submit reports to the Governor, the
President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives, indicating
the amounts of money collected and the expenditures related to this section, KRS
237.138 to 237.142,[ and KRS 237.115,] 244.125, 527.020, and 527.070, and the
administration of the provisions of this section, KRS 237.138 to 237.142,[ and KRS
237.115,] 244.125, 527.020, and 527.070.
(19) The General Assembly finds as a matter of public policy that it is necessary to
provide statewide uniform standards for issuing licenses to carry concealed firearms
and to occupy the field of regulation of the bearing of concealed firearms to ensure
Page 20 of 34
XXXX 1/13/2026 2:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1766
that no person who qualifies under the provisions of this section is denied his or her
rights. The General Assembly does not delegate to the Department of Kentucky
State Police the authority to regulate or restrict the issuing of licenses provided for
in this section beyond those provisions contained in this section. This section shall
be liberally construed to carry out the constitutional right to bear arms for self-
defense.
(20) (a) A person who is not a resident of Kentucky and who has a valid license issued
by another state of the United States to carry a concealed deadly weapon in
that state may, subject to provisions of Kentucky law, carry a concealed
deadly weapon in Kentucky, and his or her license shall be considered as valid
in Kentucky.
(b) If a person with a valid license to carry a concealed deadly weapon issued
from another state that has entered into a reciprocity agreement with the
Department of Kentucky State Police becomes a resident of Kentucky, the
license issued by the other state shall be considered as valid for the first one
hundred twenty (120) days of the person's residence in Kentucky, if within
sixty (60) days of moving to Kentucky, the person completes a form
provided[promulgated] by the Department of Kentucky State Police which
shall include:
1. A signed and notarized statement averring that to the best of his or her
knowledge the person's license to carry a concealed deadly weapon is
valid and in compliance with applicable out-of-state law, and has not
been revoked or suspended for any reason except for valid forfeiture due
to departure from the issuing state;
2. The person's name, date of birth, citizenship, gender, Social Security
number if applicable, proof that he or she is a citizen of the United
States, a permanent resident of the United States, or otherwise lawfully
Page 21 of 34
XXXX 1/13/2026 2:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1766
present in the United States, former out-of-state address, current address
within the state of Kentucky, date on which Kentucky residence began,
state which issued the concealed carry license, the issuing state's
concealed carry license number, and the state of issuance of the license;
and
3. A photocopy of the person's out-of-state license to carry a concealed
deadly weapon.
(c) Within sixty (60) days of moving to Kentucky, the person shall deliver the
form and accompanying documents by registered or certified mail, return
receipt requested, to the address indicated on the form provided by the
Department of Kentucky State Police pursuant to this subsection.
(d) The out-of-state concealed carry license shall become invalid in Kentucky
upon the earlier of:
1. The out-of-state person having resided in Kentucky for more than one
hundred twenty (120) days; or
2. The person being issued a Kentucky concealed deadly weapon license
pursuant to this section.
(e) The Department of Kentucky State Police shall, not less than once every
twelve (12) months, make written inquiry of the concealed deadly weapon
carrying licensing authorities in each other state as to whether a Kentucky
resident may carry a concealed deadly weapon in their state based upon
having a valid Kentucky concealed deadly weapon license, or whether a
Kentucky resident may apply for a concealed deadly weapon carrying license
in that state based upon having a valid Kentucky concealed deadly weapon
license. The Department of Kentucky State Police shall attempt to secure from
each other state permission for Kentucky residents who hold a valid Kentucky
concealed deadly weapon license to carry concealed deadly weapons in that
Page 22 of 34
XXXX 1/13/2026 2:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1766
state, either on the basis of the Kentucky license or on the basis that the
Kentucky license is sufficient to permit the issuance of a similar license by the
other state. The Department of Kentucky State Police shall enter into a written
reciprocity agreement with the appropriate agency in each state that agrees to
permit Kentucky residents to carry concealed deadly weapons in the other
state on the basis of a Kentucky-issued concealed deadly weapon license or
that will issue a license to carry concealed deadly weapons in the other state
based upon a Kentucky concealed deadly weapon license. If a reciprocity
agreement is reached, the requirement to recontact the other state each twelve
(12) months shall be eliminated as long as the reciprocity agreement is in
force. The information shall be a public record and shall be available to
individual requesters free of charge for the first copy and at the normal rate
for open records requests for additional copies.
(21) By March 1 of each year, the Department of Kentucky State Police shall submit a
statistical report to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the
House of Representatives, indicating the number of licenses issued, revoked,
suspended, and denied since the previous report and in total, and[ also] the number
of licenses currently valid. The report shall also include the number of arrests,
convictions, and types of crimes committed since the previous report by individuals
licensed to carry concealed weapons.
(22) The following provisions shall apply to concealed deadly weapon training classes
conducted by the Department of Criminal Justice Training or any other agency
pursuant to this section:
(a) No concealed deadly weapon instructor trainer shall have his or her
certification as a concealed deadly weapon instructor trainer reduced to that of
instructor or revoked except after a hearing conducted pursuant to KRS
Chapter 13B in which the instructor is found to have committed an act in
Page 23 of 34
XXXX 1/13/2026 2:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1766
violation of the applicable statutes or administrative regulations;
(b) No concealed deadly weapon instructor shall have his or her certification as a
concealed deadly weapon instructor license suspended or revoked except after
a hearing conducted pursuant to KRS Chapter 13B in which the instructor is
found to have committed an act in violation of the applicable statutes or
administrative regulations;
(c) The department shall not require prior notification that an applicant class or
instructor class will be conducted by a certified instructor or instructor trainer;
(d) Each concealed deadly weapon instructor or instructor trainer who teaches a
concealed deadly weapon applicant or concealed deadly weapon instructor
class shall supply the Department of Criminal Justice Training with a class
roster indicating which students enrolled and successfully completed the class,
and which contains the name and address of each student, within five (5)
working days of the completion of the class. The information may be sent by
mail, facsimile, email, or other method which will result in the receipt of or
production of a hard copy of the information. The postmark, facsimile date, or
email date shall be considered as the date on which the notice was sent.
Concealed deadly weapon class applicant, instructor, and instructor trainer
information and records shall be confidential. The department may release to
any person or organization the name, address, and telephone number of a
concealed deadly weapon instructor or instructor trainer if that instructor or
instructor trainer authorizes the release of the information in writing. The
department shall include on any application for an instructor or instructor
trainer certification a statement that the applicant either does or does not
desire the applicant's name, address, and telephone number to be made public;
(e) An instructor trainer who assists in the conduct of a concealed deadly weapon
instructor class or concealed deadly weapon applicant class for more than two
Page 24 of 34
XXXX 1/13/2026 2:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1766
(2) hours shall be considered[ as] to have taught a class for the purpose of
maintaining his or her certification. All class record forms shall include spaces
for assistant instructors to sign and certify that they have assisted in the
conduct of a concealed deadly weapon instructor or concealed deadly weapon
class;
(f) An instructor who assists in the conduct of a concealed deadly weapon
applicant class for more than two (2) hours shall be considered[ as] to have
taught a class for the purpose of maintaining his or her license. All class
record forms shall include spaces for assistant instructors to sign and certify
that they have assisted in the conduct of a concealed deadly weapon class;
(g) 1. If the Department of Criminal Justice Training believes that a firearms
instructor trainer or certified firearms instructor has not in fact complied
with the requirements for teaching a certified firearms instructor or
applicant class by not teaching the class as specified in KRS 237.126, or
who has taught an insufficient class as specified in KRS 237.128, the
department shall send to each person who has been listed as successfully
completing the concealed deadly weapon applicant class or concealed
deadly weapon instructor class a verification form on which the time,
date, date of range firing if different from the date on which the class
was conducted, location, and instructor of the class is listed by the
department and which requires the person to answer "yes" or "no" to
specific questions regarding the conduct of the training class.
2. The form shall be completed under oath and shall be returned to the
Department of Criminal Justice Training not later than forty-five (45)
days after its receipt.
3. A person who fails to complete the form, to sign the form, or to return
the form to the Department of Criminal Justice Training within the time
Page 25 of 34
XXXX 1/13/2026 2:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1766
frame specified in this section or who, as a result of information on the
returned form, is determined by the Department of Criminal Justice
Training, following a hearing pursuant to KRS Chapter 13B, to not have
received the training required by law shall have his or her concealed
deadly weapon license revoked by the Department of Kentucky State
Police, following a hearing conducted by the Department of Criminal
Justice Training pursuant to KRS Chapter 13B, at which hearing the
person is found to have violated the provisions of this section or who
has been found not to have received the training required by law;
(h) The department shall annually, not later than December 31 of each year,
report to the Legislative Research Commission:
1. The number of firearms instructor trainers and certified firearms
instructors whose certifications were suspended, revoked, denied, or
who were otherwise disciplined;
2. The reasons for the imposition of suspensions, revocations, denials, or
other discipline; and
3. Suggestions for improvement of the concealed deadly weapon applicant
training program and instructor process;
(i) If a concealed deadly weapon license holder is convicted of, pleads guilty to,
or enters an Alford plea to a felony offense, then his or her concealed deadly
weapon license shall be immediately[forthwith] revoked by the Department of
Kentucky State Police as a matter of law;
(j) If a concealed deadly weapon instructor or instructor trainer is convicted of,
pleads guilty to, or enters an Alford plea to a felony offense, then his or her
concealed deadly weapon instructor certification or concealed deadly weapon
instructor trainer certification shall be revoked by the Department of Criminal
Justice Training as a matter of law; and
Page 26 of 34
XXXX 1/13/2026 2:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1766
(k) The following shall be in effect:
1. Action to eliminate the firearms instructor trainer program is prohibited.
The program shall remain in effect, and no firearms instructor trainer
shall have his or her certification reduced to that of certified firearms
instructor;
2. The Department of Kentucky State Police shall revoke the concealed
deadly weapon license of any person who received no firearms training
as required by KRS 237.126 and administrative regulations, or who
received insufficient training as required by KRS 237.128 and
administrative regulations, if the person voluntarily admits nonreceipt of
training or admits receipt of insufficient training, or if either nonreceipt
of training or receipt of insufficient training is proven following a
hearing conducted by the Department of Criminal Justice Training
pursuant to KRS Chapter 13B.
Section 3. KRS 527.020 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of carrying a concealed weapon when he or she carries concealed
a firearm or other deadly weapon on or about his or her person in violation of this
section.
(2) Peace officers and certified court security officers, when necessary for their
protection in the discharge of their official duties; United States mail carriers when
actually engaged in their duties; and agents and messengers of express companies,
when necessary for their protection in the discharge of their official duties, may
carry concealed weapons on or about their person.
(3) The director of the Division of Law Enforcement in the Department of Fish and
Wildlife Resources, game wardens of the Department of Fish and Wildlife
Resources, and policemen directly employed by state, county, city, or urban-county
governments may carry concealed deadly weapons on or about their person at all
Page 27 of 34
XXXX 1/13/2026 2:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1766
times within the Commonwealth of Kentucky, when expressly authorized to do so
by law or by the government employing the officer.
(4) Persons carrying concealed weapons in accordance with KRS 237.109 or licensed
to carry a concealed deadly weapon pursuant to KRS 237.110 may carry a
concealed firearm or other concealed deadly weapon on or about their persons at all
times within the Commonwealth of Kentucky, if the firearm or concealed deadly
weapon is carried in conformity with the requirements of KRS 237.109 or 237.110.
Unless otherwise specifically provided by the Kentucky Revised Statutes or
applicable federal law, a[no] criminal penalty shall not attach to carrying a
concealed firearm or other deadly weapon at any location at which an unconcealed
firearm or other deadly weapon may be constitutionally carried. A[No] person or
organization, public or private, shall not prohibit a person from possessing a
firearm, ammunition, or both, or other deadly weapon in his or her vehicle in
compliance with the provisions of KRS 237.109 and[,] 237.110[, and 237.115].
Any attempt by a person or organization, public or private, to violate the provisions
of this subsection may be the subject of an action for appropriate relief or for
damages in a Circuit Court or District Court of competent jurisdiction.
(5) (a) The following persons, if they hold a license to carry a concealed deadly
weapon pursuant to KRS 237.110 or 237.138 to 237.142, may carry a firearm
or other concealed deadly weapon on or about their persons at all times and at
all locations within the Commonwealth of Kentucky, without any limitation
other than as provided in this subsection:
1. A Commonwealth's attorney or assistant Commonwealth's attorney;
2. A retired Commonwealth's attorney or retired assistant Commonwealth's
attorney;
3. A county attorney or assistant county attorney;
4. A retired county attorney or retired assistant county attorney;
Page 28 of 34
XXXX 1/13/2026 2:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1766
5. A justice or judge of the Court of Justice;
6. A retired or senior status justice or judge of the Court of Justice; and
7. A retired peace officer who holds a concealed deadly weapon license
issued pursuant to the federal Law Enforcement Officers Safety Act, 18
U.S.C. sec. 926C, and KRS 237.138 to 237.142.
(b) The provisions of this subsection shall not authorize a person specified in this
subsection to carry a concealed deadly weapon in a detention facility as
defined in KRS 520.010 or on the premises of a detention facility without the
permission of the warden, jailer, or other person in charge of the facility, or
the permission of a person authorized by the warden, jailer, or other person in
charge of the detention facility to give the[such] permission. As used in this
section, "detention facility" does not include courtrooms, facilities, or other
premises used by the Court of Justice or administered by the Administrative
Office of the Courts.
(c) A person specified in this section who is issued a concealed deadly weapon
license shall be issued a license which bears on its face the statement that it is
valid at all locations within the Commonwealth of Kentucky and may have
such other identifying characteristics as determined by the Department of
Kentucky State Police.
(6) (a) Except as provided in this subsection, the following persons may carry
concealed deadly weapons on or about their person at all times and at all
locations within the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
1. An elected sheriff and full-time and part-time deputy sheriffs certified
pursuant to KRS 15.380 to 15.404 when expressly authorized to do so
by the unit of government employing the officer;
2. An elected jailer and a deputy jailer who has successfully completed
Department of Corrections basic training and maintains his or her
Page 29 of 34
XXXX 1/13/2026 2:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1766
current in-service training when expressly authorized to do so by the
jailer; and
3. The department head or any employee of a corrections department in
any jurisdiction where the office of elected jailer has been merged with
the office of sheriff who has successfully completed Department of
Corrections basic training and maintains his or her current in-service
training when expressly authorized to do so by the unit of government
by which he or she is employed.
(b) The provisions of this subsection shall not authorize a person specified in this
subsection to carry a concealed deadly weapon in a detention facility as
defined in KRS 520.010 or on the premises of a detention facility without the
permission of the warden, jailer, or other person in charge of the facility, or
the permission of a person authorized by the warden, jailer, or other person in
charge of the detention facility to give such permission. As used in this
section, "detention facility" does not include courtrooms, facilities, or other
premises used by the Court of Justice or administered by the Administrative
Office of the Courts.
(7) (a) A full-time paid peace officer of a government agency from another state or
territory of the United States or an elected sheriff from another territory of the
United States may carry a concealed deadly weapon in Kentucky, on or off
duty, if the other state or territory accords a Kentucky full-time paid peace
officer and a Kentucky elected sheriff the same rights by law. If the other state
or territory limits a Kentucky full-time paid peace officer or elected sheriff to
carrying a concealed deadly weapon while on duty, then that same restriction
shall apply to a full-time paid peace officer or elected sheriff from that state or
territory.
(b) The provisions of this subsection shall not authorize a person specified in this
Page 30 of 34
XXXX 1/13/2026 2:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1766
subsection to carry a concealed deadly weapon in a detention facility as
defined in KRS 520.010 or on the premises of a detention facility without the
permission of the warden, jailer, or other person in charge of the facility, or
the permission of a person authorized by the warden, jailer, or other person in
charge of the detention facility to give such permission. As used in this
section, "detention facility" does not include courtrooms, facilities, or other
premises used by the Court of Justice or administered by the Administrative
Office of the Courts.
(8) A loaded or unloaded firearm or other deadly weapon shall not be deemed
concealed on or about the person if it is located in any enclosed container,
compartment, or storage space installed as original equipment in a motor vehicle by
its manufacturer, including but not limited to a glove compartment, center console,
or seat pocket, regardless of whether said enclosed container, storage space, or
compartment is locked, unlocked, or does not have a locking mechanism. A[No]
person or organization, public or private, shall not prohibit a person from keeping a
loaded or unloaded firearm or ammunition, or both, or other deadly weapon in a
vehicle in accordance with the provisions of this subsection. Any attempt by a
person or organization, public or private, to violate the provisions of this subsection
may be the subject of an action for appropriate relief or for damages in a Circuit
Court or District Court of competent jurisdiction. This subsection shall not apply to
any person prohibited from possessing a firearm pursuant to KRS 527.040.
(9) The provisions of this section shall not apply to a person who carries a concealed
deadly weapon on or about his or her person:
(a) If he or she is the owner of the property or has the permission of the owner of
the property, on real property which he or she or his or her spouse, parent,
grandparent, or child owns;
(b) If he or she is the lessee of the property or has the permission of the lessee of
Page 31 of 34
XXXX 1/13/2026 2:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1766
the property, on real property which he or she or his or her spouse, parent,
grandparent, or child occupies pursuant to a lease; or
(c) If he or she is the sole proprietor of the business, on real property owned or
leased by the business.
(10) Carrying a concealed weapon is a Class A misdemeanor, unless the defendant has
been previously convicted of a felony in which a deadly weapon was possessed,
used, or displayed, in which case it is a Class D felony.
Section 4. KRS 527.070 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawful possession of a weapon on school property when he
or she knowingly deposits, possesses, or carries, whether openly or concealed, for
purposes other than instructional or school-sanctioned ceremonial purposes, or the
purposes permitted in subsection (3) of this section, any firearm or other deadly
weapon, destructive device, or booby trap device in any public or private school
building or bus, on any public or private school campus, grounds, recreation area,
athletic field, or any other property owned, used, or operated by any board of
education, school, board of trustees, regents, or directors for the administration of
any public or private educational institution. The provisions of this section shall not
apply to institutions of postsecondary or higher education.
(2) Each chief administrator of a public or private school shall display about the school
in prominent locations, including, but not limited to, sports arenas, gymnasiums,
stadiums, and cafeterias, a sign at least six (6) inches high and fourteen (14) inches
wide stating:
UNLAWFUL POSSESSION OF A WEAPON ON SCHOOL
PROPERTY IN KENTUCKY IS A FELONY PUNISHABLE
BY A MAXIMUM OF FIVE (5) YEARS IN PRISON AND A
TEN THOUSAND DOLLAR ($10,000) FINE.
Failure to post the sign shall not relieve any person of liability under this section.
Page 32 of 34
XXXX 1/13/2026 2:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1766
(3) The provisions of this section prohibiting the unlawful possession of a weapon on
school property shall not apply to:
(a) An adult who is not a pupil of any secondary school and who possesses a
firearm, if the firearm is contained within a vehicle operated by the adult and
is not removed from the vehicle, except for a purpose permitted in this
section[herein], or brandished by the adult, or by any other person acting with
expressed or implied consent of the adult, while the vehicle is on school
property;
(b) Any pupils who are members of the reserve officers training corps or pupils
enrolled in a course of instruction or members of a school club or team, to the
extent they are required to carry arms or weapons in the discharge of their
official class or team duties;
(c) Any peace officer or police officer authorized to carry a concealed weapon
pursuant to KRS 527.020;
(d) Persons employed by the Armed Forces of the United States or members of
the National Guard or militia when required in the discharge of their official
duties to carry arms or weapons;
(e) Civil officers of the United States in the discharge of their official duties.
[Nothing in ]This section shall not be construed as to allow any person to
carry a concealed weapon into a public or private elementary or secondary
school building;
(f) Any other persons, including, but not limited to, exhibitors of historical
displays, who have been authorized to carry a firearm by the board of
education or board of trustees of the public or private institution;
(g) A person hunting during the lawful hunting season on lands owned by any
public or private educational institution and designated as open to hunting by
the board of education or board of trustees of the educational institution;
Page 33 of 34
XXXX 1/13/2026 2:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1766
(h) A person possessing unloaded hunting weapons while traversing the grounds
of any public or private educational institution for the purpose of gaining
access to public or private lands open to hunting with the intent to hunt on the
public or private lands, unless the lands of the educational institution are
posted prohibiting the entry;[ or]
(i) A person possessing guns or knives when conducting or attending a "gun and
knife show" when the program has been approved by the board of education
or board of trustees of the educational institution; or
(j) A person with a valid license to carry concealed deadly weapons issued
pursuant to Section 2 of this Act, except pupils attending schools subject to
any policy adopted under KRS 158.150(2) or other law required under 20
U.S.C. sec. 7961.
(4) Unlawful possession of a weapon on school property is a Class D felony.
Section 5. The following KRS section is repealed:
237.115 Construction of KRS 237.110 -- Prohibition by local government units of
carrying concealed deadly weapons in governmental buildings -- Restriction on
criminal penalties.
Page 34 of 34
XXXX 1/13/2026 2:43 PM Jacketed